Massachusetts, session 194th, H865.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1 of chapter 51 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition, is
hereby amended by inserting after the word “conviction”, in line 3, the following words:- for a
violation of section 13, 13b, 13b ½, 16 or 24 of chapter 265 or for which the person may be
punished by imprisonment in a state prison for life.
of 1